California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(C) For purposes of this section and Section 5831, “affordable housing” includes supportive housing. “Supportive housing” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50675.14 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) County programs for housing interventions shall comply with all requirements specified by the State Department of Health Care Services, pursuant to Section 5963.05, for the purposes of administering paragraphs (1) and (2).

(c) (1) To the extent that necessary federal approvals have been obtained for the Medi-Cal program to cover housing interventions and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized, the housing interventions funds distributed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892 may be used for the nonfederal share of Medi-Cal covered housing related services. The housing intervention funds distributed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892 shall only cover the costs that cannot be paid for with Medi-Cal program funds, including
 costs for Medi-Cal members enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, that does not cover those services.

(2) Funds shall not be used for housing interventions covered by a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a capital development project funded pursuant to this section shall not constitute a “low rent housing project,” as provided for in subdivision (e).

(e) “Low rent housing project,” as defined in Section 1 of Article XXXIV of the California Constitution, does not apply to a project that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) The project meets both of the following criteria:

(A) Is privately owned housing, receiving no ad valorem property tax exemption other than exemptions granted pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) of Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, not fully reimbursed to all taxing entities.

(B) Not more than 49 percent of the dwellings, apartments, or other living accommodations of the development may be occupied by persons of low income.

(2) The project is privately owned housing, is not exempt from ad valorem taxation by reason of public ownership, and is not financed with direct long-term financing from a public body.

(3) The project is intended for
 owner-occupancy, which may include a limited-equity housing cooperative, as defined in Section 50076.5 of the Health and Safety Code, cooperative, or condominium ownership rather than for rental-occupancy.

(4) The project consists of newly constructed, privately owned, one- to four-family dwellings not located on adjoining sites.

(5) The project consists of existing dwelling units leased by the state public body from the private owner of these dwelling units.

(6) The project consists of the rehabilitation, reconstruction, improvement, or addition to, or replacement of, dwelling units of a previously existing low-rent housing project or a project previously or currently occupied by lower income households, as defined in
 Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) The project consists of the acquisition, rehabilitation, reconstruction, or improvement, or any combination thereof, of a project that, prior to the date of the transaction to acquire, rehabilitate, reconstruct, or improve, or any combination thereof, was subject to a contract for federal or state public body assistance for the purpose of providing affordable housing for low-income households and maintains, or enters into, a contract for federal or
 state public body assistance for the purpose of providing affordable housing for low-income households.

(8) The project consists of the acquisition, rehabilitation, reconstruction, alterations work, or new construction, or a combination thereof, of lodging facilities or dwelling units using moneys received from the Behavioral Health Services Fund established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5890. 

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are provided from the Behavioral Health Services Fund for purposes of this section. This section does not obligate the counties to use funds from any other source for services pursuant to this section.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 42) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 43.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5831.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a capital development project funded, in whole or in part, pursuant to Section 5892 shall be a use by right that shall be subject to the streamlined, ministerial review process, pursuant to subdivision (b), if it meets all of the following criteria:

(A) (i) Affordable housing shall be located in a zone where multifamily residential, office, retail, or parking are a principally permitted use.
 Nothing here shall be construed to limit other housing interventions pursuant to Section 5830 that conform to existing zoning.

(ii) The intent of capital development funding is to prioritize the production of housing that provides long-term housing stability.

(B) At least 75 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins parcels that are developed with urban uses.

(C) It satisfies the requirements specified in subparagraphs (B) to (K), inclusive, of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 65913.4 of the Government Code.

(D) It is not on a site or
 adjoined to any site where more than one-third of the square footage on the site is dedicated to industrial use.

(E) The development will meet the following objective zoning standards, objective subdivision standards, and objective design review standards:

(i) For affordable housing, the applicable objective standards shall be those for the zone that allows residential use at a greater density between the following:

(I) The existing zoning designation for the parcel if existing zoning allows for residential use.

(II) The zoning designation for the closest parcel that allows residential use at a density deemed appropriate to accommodate housing for lower income households in that jurisdiction as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65583.2 of the Government Code.

(ii) The applicable objective standards shall be those in effect at the time that the development application is submitted to the local government pursuant to this article.

(iii) A development proposed pursuant to this section shall be eligible for the same density bonus, incentives or concessions, waivers or reductions of development standards, and parking ratios applicable to a project that meets the criteria specified in subparagraph (G) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 65915 of the Government Code.

(F) No housing units were acquired by eminent domain.

(G) The housing units will be in decent, safe, and sanitary condition at the time of their occupancy.

(H) The project meets the labor standards contained in Sections 65912.130 and 65912.131 of the Government Code.

(I) The project provides housing for individuals who meet the criteria specified in subdivision (a) of Section 5830 and their families.

(J) Affordable housing shall require long-term covenants and restrictions require the housing units to be restricted to
 persons who meet the criteria specified in subdivision (a) for no fewer than 30 years.

(2) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, parcels only separated by a street or highway shall be considered to be adjoined.

(B) For purposes of this subdivision, “dedicated to industrial use” means any of the following:

(i) The square footage is currently being used as an industrial use.

(ii) The most recently permitted use of the square footage is an industrial use.

(iii) The site was designated for industrial use in the latest version of a local government’s general plan adopted before January
 1, 2022.

(b) The project shall be subject to the following streamlined, ministerial review process:

(1) (A) If the local government determines that a development submitted pursuant to this article is consistent with the objective planning standards specified in this article, it shall approve the development.

(B) If a local government determines that a development submitted pursuant to this article is in conflict with any of the objective planning standards specified in this article, it shall provide the development proponent written documentation of which standard or standards the development conflicts with, and an explanation for the reason or reasons the development conflicts with that
 standard or standards, within the following timeframes:

(i) Within 60 days of submission of the development proposal to the local government if the development contains 150 or fewer housing units.

(ii) Within 90 days of submission of the development proposal to the local government if the development contains more than 150 housing units.

(C) If the local government fails to provide the required documentation pursuant to subparagraph (B), the development shall be deemed to satisfy the required objective planning standards.

(D) (i) For purposes of this section, a development is consistent with the objective planning standards if there is
 substantial evidence that would allow a reasonable person to conclude that the development is consistent with the objective planning standards.

(ii) For purposes of this section, a development is not in conflict with the objective planning standards solely on the basis that application materials are not included, if the application contains substantial evidence that would allow a reasonable person to conclude that the development is consistent with the objective planning standards.

(E) The determination of whether a proposed project submitted pursuant to this section is or is not in conflict with the objective planning standards is not a “project” as defined in Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) Design
 review of the development may be conducted by the local government’s planning commission or any equivalent board or commission responsible for design review. That design review shall be objective and be strictly focused on assessing compliance with criteria required for streamlined, ministerial review of projects, as well as any reasonable objective design standards published and adopted by ordinance or resolution by a local jurisdiction before submittal of the development to the local government, and shall be broadly applicable to developments within the jurisdiction. That design review shall be completed as follows and shall not in any way inhibit, chill, or preclude the ministerial approval provided by this section or its effect, as applicable:

(A) Within 90 days of submittal of the development proposal to the local government pursuant to
 this section if the development contains 150 or fewer housing units.

(B) Within 180 days of submittal of the development proposal to the local government pursuant to this section if the development contains more than 150 housing units.

(c) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code shall not apply to actions taken by the Department of Housing and Community Development, the State Department of Health Care Services, or a local agency not acting as the lead agency to provide financial assistance or insurance for the development and construction of projects built pursuant to this section.

(d) The applicant shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research and the
 county clerk of the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Objective zoning standards,” “objective subdivision standards,” and “objective design review standards” mean standards that involve no personal or subjective judgment by a public official and are uniformly verifiable by reference to an external and uniform benchmark or criterion available and knowable by both the development applicant or proponent and the public official before submittal. These standards may be embodied in alternative objective land use specifications adopted by a city or county, and may include, but are not limited to, housing
 overlay zones, specific plans, inclusionary zoning ordinances, and density bonus ordinances.

(2) “Use by right” means a development project that satisfies both of the following conditions:

(A) The development project does not require a conditional use permit, planned unit development permit, or other discretionary local government review.

(B) The development project is not a “project” for purposes of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary
 election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 44.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.4. Early Psychosis Intervention Plus (EPI PLUS) Program [5835. - 5835.5.]

5835.

(a) This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Early Psychosis Intervention Plus (EPI Plus) Program to encompass early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention.

(b) As used in this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Commission” means the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission established pursuant to Section 5845.

(2) “Early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention” refers to a program that utilizes evidence-based approaches and services to identify and support clinical and functional recovery of individuals by reducing the severity of first, or early, episode
 psychotic symptoms, other early markers of serious mental illness, such as mood disorders, keeping individuals in school or at work, and putting them on a path to better health and wellness. This may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Focused outreach to at-risk and in-need populations as applicable.

(B) Recovery-oriented psychotherapy, including cognitive behavioral therapy focusing on cooccurring disorders.

(C) Family psychoeducation and support.

(D) Supported education and employment.

(E) Pharmacotherapy and primary care coordination.

(F) Use of innovative technology for mental health information
 feedback access that can provide a valued and unique opportunity to assist individuals with mental health needs and to optimize care.

(G) Case management.

(3) “County” includes a city receiving funds pursuant to Section 5701.5.

(c) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 45) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 14.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 46 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.

(a) This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Early Psychosis Intervention (EPI) Plus Program to encompass early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention.

(b) As used in this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Commission” means the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission established pursuant to Section 5845.

(2) “Early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention” refers to a program that utilizes evidence-based approaches and services to identify and support clinical and functional
 recovery of individuals by reducing the severity of first, or early, episode psychotic symptoms, other early markers of serious mental illness, such as mood disorders, keeping individuals in school or at work, and putting them on a path to better health and wellness. This may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Focused outreach to at-risk and in-need populations as applicable.

(B) Recovery-oriented psychotherapy, including cognitive behavioral therapy focusing on cooccurring disorders.

(C) Family psychoeducation and support.

(D) Supported education and employment.

(E) Pharmacotherapy and primary care coordination.

(F) Use of innovative technology for mental health information feedback access that can provide a valued and unique opportunity to assist individuals with mental health needs and to optimize care.

(G) Case management.

(3) “County” includes a city receiving funds pursuant to Section 5701.5.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 45) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 46.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.1.

(a) The Early Psychosis and Mood Disorder Detection and Intervention Fund is hereby created within the State Treasury. The moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the commission for the purposes of this part. The commission may use no more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of the amount deposited annually into the fund for administrative expenses in implementing this part, including providing technical assistance.

(b) There may be paid into the fund all of the following:

(1) Any private donation or grant.

(2) Any other federal or state grant.

(3) Any interest that accrues on amounts in the fund and any moneys previously allocated from the fund that are subsequently returned to the fund.

(c) Moneys shall be allocated from the fund by the commission for the purposes of this part.

(d) Distributions from the fund shall be supplemental to any other amounts otherwise provided to county behavioral health departments for any purpose and shall only be used to fund early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention programs.

(e) The commission may elect not to make awards if available funds are insufficient.

(f) Funds shall not be appropriated from the General Fund for the purposes of this
 part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 414, Sec. 2.   (AB 1315)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.2.

(a) There is hereby established an advisory committee to the commission. The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall accept nominations and applications to the committee, and the chair of the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall appoint members to the committee, unless otherwise specified. Membership on the committee shall be as follows:

(1) The chair of the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, or their designee, who shall serve as the chair of the committee.

(2) The president of the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, or their designee.

(3) The director of a county behavioral health department that administers an early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention-type program in their county.

(4) A representative from a nonprofit community mental health organization that focuses on service delivery to transition-aged youth and young adults.

(5) A psychiatrist or psychologist.

(6) A representative from the Behavioral Health Center of Excellence at the University of California, Davis, or a representative from a similar entity with expertise from within the University of California system.

(7) A representative from a health plan participating in the Medi-Cal managed care program and the employer-based health care
 market.

(8) A representative from the medical technologies industry who is knowledgeable in advances in technology related to the use of innovative social media and mental health information feedback access.

(9) A representative knowledgeable in evidence-based practices as they pertain to the operations of an early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention-type program, including knowledge of other states’ experiences.

(10) A representative who is a parent or guardian caring for a young child with a mental illness.

(11) An at-large representative identified by the chair.

(12) A representative who is a person with lived experience of a mental illness.

(13) A primary care provider from a licensed primary care clinic that provides integrated primary and behavioral health care.

(b) The advisory committee shall be convened by the chair and shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Provide advice and guidance broadly on approaches to early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention programs from an evidence-based perspective.

(2) Review and make recommendations on the commission’s guidelines or any regulations in the development, design, selection of awards pursuant to this part, and the implementation or oversight of the early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention competitive selection process established pursuant to this part.

(3) Assist and advise the commission in the overall evaluation of the early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention competitive selection process.

(4) Provide advice and guidance as requested and directed by the chair.

(5) Recommend a core set of standardized clinical and outcome measures that the funded programs would be required to collect, subject to future revision. A free data sharing portal shall be available to all participating programs.

(6) Inform the funded programs about the potential to participate in clinical research studies.

(c) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section
 shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 47) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 15.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 48 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.2.

(a) There is hereby established an advisory committee to the commission. The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall accept nominations and applications to the committee, and the chair of the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall appoint members to the committee, unless otherwise specified. Membership on the committee shall be as follows:

(1) The chair of the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, or their designee, who shall serve as the chair of the committee.

(2) The president of the County Behavioral Health
 Directors Association of California, or their designee.

(3) The director of a county behavioral health department that administers an early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention-type program in their county.

(4) A representative from a nonprofit community mental health organization that focuses on service delivery to transition-aged youth and young adults.

(5) A psychiatrist or psychologist.

(6) A representative from the Behavioral Health Center of Excellence at the University of California, Davis, or a representative from a similar entity with expertise from within the University of California system.

(7) A representative from a health plan participating in the Medi-Cal managed care program and the employer-based health care market.

(8) A representative from the medical technologies industry who is knowledgeable in advances in technology related to the use of innovative social media and mental health information feedback access.

(9) A representative knowledgeable in evidence-based practices as they pertain to the operations of an early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention-type program, including knowledge of other states’ experiences.

(10) A representative who is a parent or guardian caring for a young child with a mental
 illness.

(11) An at-large representative identified by the chair.

(12) A representative who is a person with lived experience of a mental illness.

(13) A primary care provider from a licensed primary care clinic that provides integrated primary and behavioral health care.

(14) A school social worker, school psychologist, or school counselor holding a pupil personnel services credential.

(15) A California public school administrator.

(16) A representative knowledgeable in community-defined evidence practices and reducing behavioral health
 disparities. 

(b) The advisory committee shall be convened by the chair and shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Provide advice and guidance broadly on approaches to early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention programs from an evidence-based perspective.

(2) Review and make recommendations on the commission’s guidelines or regulations in the development, design, and selection of awards pursuant to this part, and the implementation or oversight of the early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention competitive selection process established pursuant to this part.

(3) Assist and advise the commission in the overall evaluation of
 the early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention competitive selection process.

(4) Provide advice and guidance as requested and directed by the chair.

(5) Recommend a core set of standardized clinical and outcome measures that the funded programs would be required to collect, subject to future revision. A free data sharing portal shall be available to all participating programs.

(6) Inform the funded programs about the potential to participate in clinical research studies.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary
 election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 47) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 48.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the commission to administer a competitive selection process as provided in this part to create new, and to expand and improve the fidelity of existing, service capacity for early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention services in California.

(b) The core objectives of this competitive selection process include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Expanding the provision of high-quality, evidence-based early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention services within California.

(2) Improving access to effective services for transition-aged
 youth and young adults at high risk for, or experiencing, psychotic symptoms, including the prodromal phase, or psychotic disorders.

(3) More comprehensively and effectively measuring programmatic effectiveness and enrolled client outcomes of programs receiving awards in the competitive selection process.

(4) Improving the client experience in accessing services and in working toward recovery and wellness.

(5) Increasing participation in school attendance, social interactions, physical health, personal bonding relationships, and active rehabilitation, including employment and daily living function development for clients.

(6) Reducing unnecessary hospitalizations and inpatient days by appropriately utilizing community-based services and improving access
 to timely assistance to early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention services.

(7) Expanding the use of innovative technologies for mental health information feedback access that can provide a valued and unique opportunity to optimize care for the target population. This may include technologies for treatment and symptom monitoring.

(8) Providing local communities with increased financial resources to leverage additional public and private funding sources to achieve improved networks of care for the target population, including transition-aged youth and young adults.

(9) Improving whole-person care by increasing access to, and coordination of, mental health and medical care services.

(c) Funds allocated by the commission shall be made
 available to selected counties, or counties acting jointly, through a competitive selection process, or to other entities for research, evaluation, technical assistance, and other related purposes.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a county, or counties acting jointly, that receive an award of funds shall be required to provide a contribution of local funds.

(2) Upon approval of the commission, after consultation with the Department of Finance and the State Department of Health Care Services, other locally acquired funding, such as federal grants or allocations, or other special funds, may also be recognized for the purpose of contributing toward any contribution requirements.

(e) Awards made by the commission shall be used to create, or expand existing capacity for, early psychosis and
 mood disorder detection and intervention services and supports. The commission shall ensure that awards result in cost-effective and evidence-based services that comprehensively address identified needs of the target population, including transition-aged youth and young adults, in counties and regions selected for funding. The commission shall also take into account at least the following criteria and factors when selecting recipients of awards and determining the amount of awards:

(1) A description of need, including, at a minimum, a comprehensive description of the early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention services and supports to be established or expanded, community need, target population to be served, linkage with other public systems of health and mental health care, linkage with schools and community social services, and related assistance as applicable, and a description of the request for funding.

(2) A description of all programmatic components, including outreach and clinical aspects, of the local early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention services and supports.

(3) A description of any contractual relationships with contracting providers as applicable, including any memorandum of understanding between project partners.

(4) A description of local funds, including the total amounts, that would be contributed toward the services and supports as required by the commission through the competitive selection process, implementing guidelines, and regulations.

(5) The project timeline.

(6) The ability of the awardee to effectively and efficiently implement or expand an
 evidence-based program as referenced in this part.

(7) A description of core data collection and the framework for evaluating outcomes, including improved access to services and supports and a cost-benefit analysis of the project.

(8) A description of the sustainability of program services and supports in future years.

(f) The commission shall determine any minimum or maximum awards, and shall take into consideration the level of need, the population to be served, and related criteria as described in subdivision (e) and in any guidance or regulations, and shall reflect the reasonable costs of providing the services and supports.

(g) Funds awarded by the commission may be used to supplement, but not supplant, existing financial and resource commitments
 of the county or counties acting jointly, that receive the award.

(h) The commission may consult with a technical assistance entity, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4061, initiate an interagency agreement with another public entity, including the University of California system, or contract for necessary technical assistance to implement this part.

(i) The advisory committee may coordinate and recommend an allocation of funding to the commission for clinical research studies. The committee may recommend an amount not to exceed 10 percent of the total amount deposited in the Early Psychosis and Mood Disorder Detection and Intervention Fund for clinical research studies. The committee may recommend, in conjunction with the principal investigators, the data elements to be included in clinical research studies funded pursuant to this subdivision. The
 results of the clinical research studies shall be made available annually to the members of the public, including stakeholders and Members of the Legislature. The results of clinical research studies shall be deidentified in accordance with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) (Public Law 104-191), including Section 164.514 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and shall not contain any personally identifiable information according to the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(j) The county and all award recipients shall comply with all applicable state and federal privacy laws that govern medical information, including, but not limited to, HIPAA and its implementing regulations, the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code),
 the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), and Section 10850.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 227.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.4.

Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the commission may implement this part without taking regulatory action until regulations are adopted. The commission shall adopt regulations implementing this part on or before January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 414, Sec. 2.   (AB 1315)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.5.

Implementation of the grant program established pursuant to Section 5835.3 and the adoption of regulations pursuant to Section 5835.4 is contingent upon appropriation by the Legislature, or the deposit into the fund established pursuant to Section 5835.1, of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the purpose of funding grants and administrative costs for the commission pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 26, Sec. 1.   (SB 79)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.6. PREVENTION AND EARLY INTERVENTION PROGRAMS [5840. - 5840.7.]



  CHAPTER 1. Prevention and Early Intervention Programs [5840. - 5840.2.]

5840.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services, in coordination with counties, shall establish a program designed to prevent mental illnesses from becoming severe and disabling. The program shall emphasize improving timely access to services for underserved populations.

(b) The program shall include the following components:

(1) Outreach to families, employers, primary care health care providers, and others to recognize the early signs of potentially severe and disabling mental illnesses.

(2) Access and linkage to medically necessary care provided by county
 mental health programs for children with serious mental illness, as defined in Section 5600.3, and for adults and seniors with severe mental illness, as defined in Section 5600.3, as early in the onset of these conditions as practicable.

(3) Reduction in stigma associated with either being diagnosed with a mental illness or seeking mental health services.

(4) Reduction in discrimination against people with mental illness.

(c) The program shall include mental health services similar to those provided under other programs that are effective in preventing mental illnesses from becoming severe, and shall also include components similar to programs that have been successful in reducing the duration of untreated severe mental
 illnesses and assisting people in quickly regaining productive lives.

(d) The program shall emphasize strategies to reduce the following negative outcomes that may result from untreated mental illness:

(1) Suicide.

(2) Incarcerations.

(3) School failure or dropout.

(4) Unemployment.

(5) Prolonged suffering.

(6) Homelessness.

(7) Removal of children from their homes.

(e) Prevention and early intervention funds may be used to broaden the provision of community-based mental health services by adding prevention and early intervention services or activities to these services, including prevention and early intervention strategies that address mental health needs, substance misuse or substance use disorders, or needs relating to cooccurring mental health and substance use services.

(f) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 49.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version amended by Sec. 39 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

5840.

(a) (1) Each county shall establish and administer an early intervention program that is designed to prevent mental illnesses and substance use disorders from becoming severe and disabling and to reduce disparities in behavioral health.

(2) Early intervention programs shall be funded pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892.

(b) An early intervention program shall include the following components:

(1) Outreach to families, employers, primary care health care providers, behavioral health urgent care, hospitals, inclusive of emergency departments, education,
 including early care and learning, T-12, and higher education, and others to recognize the early signs of potentially severe and disabling mental health illnesses and substance use disorders.

(2) (A) Access and linkage to medically necessary care provided by county behavioral health programs as early in the onset of these conditions as practicable.

(B) Access and linkage to care includes the scaling of, and referral to, the Early Psychosis Intervention (EPI) Plus Program, pursuant to Part 3.4 (commencing with Section 5835), Coordinated Specialty Care, or other similar evidence-based practices and community-defined evidence practices for early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention programs.
